Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-4] Planning and assessment
functions of the fund; discretion to provide insurance. (a) The fund
shall be responsible for monitoring the availability of property insurance,
including insurance for covered events, in this State. If at any time the
board determines, in its sole discretion, that the private insurance market is
not making such insurance reasonably available to consumers in this State, the
fund may offer policies of hurricane property insurance for sale in accordance
with this chapter.

(b) Nothing in subsection (a) shall prohibit
the board from exercising its powers to develop plans and procedures for the
operation and management of the fund without regard to the determination of the
board as to the availability of insurance in the private market. [L 1993, c
339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next